Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-649.01
Property-carrying unit, defined.

Property-carrying unit shall mean any part of a commercial motor vehicle combination, except the truck-tractor, used to carry property and shall include trailers and semitrailers.

Laws 2006, LB 853, § 16.